algorithms/greek/stem_Unicode.sbl
// A stemmer for Modern Greek language, based on:
//
// Ntais, Georgios. Development of a Stemmer for the Greek
// Language. Diss. Royal Institute of Technology, 2006.
// http://sais.se/mthprize/2007/ntais2007.pdf
//
// Saroukos, Spyridon. Enhancing a Greek language stemmer.
// University of Tampere, 2008.
// http://tampub.uta.fi/bitstream/handle/10024/80480/gradu03463.pdf

stringescapes {}

stringdef a    hex '03B1' // alpha
stringdef v    hex '03B2' // beta
stringdef g    hex '03B3' // gamma
stringdef d    hex '03B4' // delta
stringdef e    hex '03B5' // epsilon
stringdef z    hex '03B6' // zeta
stringdef i    hex '03B7' // eta
stringdef th   hex '03B8' // theta
stringdef y    hex '03B9' // iota
stringdef k    hex '03BA' // kappa
stringdef l    hex '03BB' // lamda
stringdef m    hex '03BC' // mu
stringdef n    hex '03BD' // nu
stringdef x    hex '03BE' // xi
stringdef o    hex '03BF' // omicron
stringdef p    hex '03C0' // pi
stringdef r    hex '03C1' // rho
stringdef ss   hex '03C2' // sigma final
stringdef s    hex '03C3' // sigma
stringdef t    hex '03C4' // tau
stringdef u    hex '03C5' // upsilon
stringdef f    hex '03C6' // phi
stringdef ch   hex '03C7' // chi
stringdef ps   hex '03C8' // psi
stringdef oo   hex '03C9' // omega

stringdef A    hex '0391' // Alpha
stringdef V    hex '0392' // Beta
stringdef G    hex '0393' // Gamma
stringdef D    hex '0394' // Delta
stringdef E    hex '0395' // Epsilon
stringdef Z    hex '0396' // Zeta
stringdef I    hex '0397' // Eta
stringdef Th   hex '0398' // Theta
stringdef Y    hex '0399' // Iota
stringdef K    hex '039A' // Kappa
stringdef L    hex '039B' // Lamda
stringdef M    hex '039C' // Mu
stringdef N    hex '039D' // Nu
stringdef X    hex '039E' // Xi
stringdef O    hex '039F' // Omicron
stringdef P    hex '03A0' // Pi
stringdef R    hex '03A1' // Rho
stringdef S    hex '03A3' // Sigma
stringdef T    hex '03A4' // Tau
stringdef U    hex '03A5' // Upsilon
stringdef F    hex '03A6' // Phi
stringdef Ch   hex '03A7' // Chi
stringdef Ps   hex '03A8' // Psi
stringdef Oo   hex '03A9' // Omega

stringdef Y:   hex '03AA' // Iota with dialytika
stringdef U:   hex '03AB' // Upsilon with dialytika

stringdef a'   hex '03AC' // alpha with tonos
stringdef e'   hex '03AD' // epsilon with tonos
stringdef i'   hex '03AE' // eta with tonos
stringdef y'   hex '03AF' // iota with tonos
stringdef o'   hex '03CC' // omicron with tonos
stringdef u'   hex '03CD' // upsilon with tonos
stringdef oo'  hex '03CE' // omega with tonos

stringdef i:'  hex '0390' // iota with dialytika and tonos
stringdef u:'  hex '03B0' // upsilon with dialytika and tonos

stringdef i:   hex '03CA' // iota with dialytika
stringdef u:   hex '03CB' // upsilon with dialytika

stringdef A'   hex '0386' // Alpha with tonos
stringdef E'   hex '0388' // Epsilon with tonos
stringdef I'   hex '0389' // Eta with tonos
stringdef Y'   hex '038A' // Iota with tonos
stringdef O'   hex '038C' // Omicron with tonos
stringdef U'   hex '038E' // Upsilon with tonos
stringdef OO'  hex '038F' // Omega with tonos

externals ( stem )

booleans ( test1 )

groupings ( v v2 )

routines ( tolower has_min_length
           steps1 steps2 steps3 steps4 steps5 steps6 steps7
           steps8 steps9 steps10
           step1 step2a step2b step2c step2d step3 step4
           step5a step5b step5c step5d step5e step5f
           step5g step5h step5i
           step5j step5k step5l step5m
           step6 step7 )

define v '{a}{e}{i}{y}{o}{u}{oo}'
define v2 '{a}{e}{i}{y}{o}{oo}'

strings ( s )

integers ( length )

backwardmode (
  define has_min_length as (
    $length = len
    $length >= 3
  )

  define tolower as (
    repeat (
      [substring] among (
        '{A}' (<- '{a}')
        '{V}' (<- '{v}')
        '{G}' (<- '{g}')
        '{D}' (<- '{d}')
        '{E}' (<- '{e}')
        '{Z}' (<- '{z}')
        '{I}' (<- '{i}')
        '{Th}' (<- '{th}')
        '{Y}' (<- '{y}')
        '{K}' (<- '{k}')
        '{L}' (<- '{l}')
        '{M}' (<- '{m}')
        '{N}' (<- '{n}')
        '{X}' (<- '{x}')
        '{O}' (<- '{o}')
        '{P}' (<- '{p}')
        '{R}' (<- '{r}')
        '{S}' (<- '{s}')
        '{T}' (<- '{t}')
        '{U}' (<- '{u}')
        '{F}' (<- '{f}')
        '{Ch}' (<- '{ch}')
        '{Ps}' (<- '{ps}')
        '{Oo}' (<- '{oo}')
        '{Y:}' (<- '{y}')
        '{U:}' (<- '{u}')
        '{a'}' (<- '{a}')
        '{e'}' (<- '{e}')
        '{i'}' (<- '{i}')
        '{y'}' (<- '{y}')
        '{o'}' (<- '{o}')
        '{u'}' (<- '{u}')
        '{oo'}' (<- '{oo}')
        '{i:'}' (<- '{i}')
        '{u:'}' (<- '{u}')
        '{i:}' (<- '{i}')
        '{u:}' (<- '{u}')
        '{A'}' (<- '{a}')
        '{E'}' (<- '{e}')
        '{I'}' (<- '{i}')
        '{Y'}' (<- '{y}')
        '{O'}' (<- '{o}')
        '{U'}' (<- '{u}')
        '{OO'}' (<- '{oo}')
        '{ss}' (<- '{s}')
         '' (next)
      )
    )
  )

  define step1 as (
    [substring] among (
      '{f}{a}{g}{y}{a}' '{f}{a}{g}{y}{o}{u}' '{f}{a}{g}{y}{oo}{n}' (<- '{f}{a}')
      '{s}{k}{a}{g}{y}{a}' '{s}{k}{a}{g}{y}{o}{u}' '{s}{k}{a}{g}{y}{oo}{n}' (<- '{s}{k}{a}')
      '{o}{l}{o}{g}{y}{o}{u}' '{o}{l}{o}{g}{y}{a}' '{o}{l}{o}{g}{y}{oo}{n}' (<- '{o}{l}{o}')
      '{s}{o}{g}{y}{o}{u}' '{s}{o}{g}{y}{a}' '{s}{o}{g}{y}{oo}{n}' (<- '{s}{o}')
      '{t}{a}{t}{o}{g}{y}{a}' '{t}{a}{t}{o}{g}{y}{o}{u}' '{t}{a}{t}{o}{g}{y}{oo}{n}' (<- '{t}{a}{t}{o}')
      '{k}{r}{e}{a}{s}' '{k}{r}{e}{a}{t}{o}{s}' '{k}{r}{e}{a}{t}{a}' '{k}{r}{e}{a}{t}{oo}{n}' (<- '{k}{r}{e}')
      '{p}{e}{r}{a}{s}' '{p}{e}{r}{a}{t}{o}{s}' '{p}{e}{r}{a}{t}{i}' '{p}{e}{r}{a}{t}{a}' '{p}{e}{r}{a}{t}{oo}{n}' (<- '{p}{e}{r}')
      '{t}{e}{r}{a}{s}' '{t}{e}{r}{a}{t}{o}{s}' '{t}{e}{r}{a}{t}{a}' '{t}{e}{r}{a}{t}{oo}{n}' (<- '{t}{e}{r}')
      '{f}{oo}{s}' '{f}{oo}{t}{o}{s}' '{f}{oo}{t}{a}' '{f}{oo}{t}{oo}{n}' (<- '{f}{oo}')
      '{k}{a}{th}{e}{s}{t}{oo}{s}' '{k}{a}{th}{e}{s}{t}{oo}{t}{o}{s}' '{k}{a}{th}{e}{s}{t}{oo}{t}{a}' '{k}{a}{th}{e}{s}{t}{oo}{t}{oo}{n}' (<- '{k}{a}{th}{e}{s}{t}')
      '{g}{e}{g}{o}{n}{o}{s}' '{g}{e}{g}{o}{n}{o}{t}{o}{s}' '{g}{e}{g}{o}{n}{o}{t}{a}' '{g}{e}{g}{o}{n}{o}{t}{oo}{n}' (<- '{g}{e}{g}{o}{n}')
    )
    do unset test1
  )

  define steps1 as (
    [substring] among (
      '{y}{z}{a}' '{y}{z}{e}{s}' '{y}{z}{e}' '{y}{z}{a}{m}{e}' '{y}{z}{a}{t}{e}' '{y}{z}{a}{n}' '{y}{z}{a}{n}{e}' '{y}{z}{oo}' '{y}{z}{e}{y}{s}' '{y}{z}{e}{y}'
      '{y}{z}{o}{u}{m}{e}' '{y}{z}{e}{t}{e}' '{y}{z}{o}{u}{n}' '{y}{z}{o}{u}{n}{e}' (
        delete
        do unset test1
        ([substring] atlimit among (
          '{a}{n}{a}{m}{p}{a}' '{e}{m}{p}{a}' '{e}{p}{a}' '{x}{a}{n}{a}{p}{a}' '{p}{a}' '{p}{e}{r}{y}{p}{a}' '{a}{th}{r}{o}' '{s}{u}{n}{a}{th}{r}{o}' '{d}{a}{n}{e}'
          (-> s <- '{y}' insert s)
        )) or
        ([substring] atlimit among (
          '{m}{a}{r}{k}' '{k}{o}{r}{n}' '{a}{m}{p}{a}{r}' '{a}{r}{r}' '{v}{a}{th}{u}{r}{y}' '{v}{a}{r}{k}' '{v}' '{v}{o}{l}{v}{o}{r}' '{g}{k}{r}'
          '{g}{l}{u}{k}{o}{r}' '{g}{l}{u}{k}{u}{r}' '{y}{m}{p}' '{l}' '{l}{o}{u}' '{m}{a}{r}' '{m}' '{p}{r}' '{m}{p}{r}' '{p}{o}{l}{u}{r}' '{p}'
          '{r}' '{p}{y}{p}{e}{r}{o}{r}'
          (-> s <- '{y}{z}' insert s)
        ))
      )
    )
  )

  define steps2 as (
    [substring] among (
      '{oo}{th}{i}{k}{a}' '{oo}{th}{i}{k}{e}{s}' '{oo}{th}{i}{k}{e}' '{oo}{th}{i}{k}{a}{m}{e}' '{oo}{th}{i}{k}{a}{t}{e}' '{oo}{th}{i}{k}{a}{n}' '{oo}{th}{i}{k}{a}{n}{e}' (
        delete
        do unset test1
        [substring] atlimit among (
          '{a}{l}' '{v}{y}' '{e}{n}' '{u}{ps}' '{l}{y}' '{z}{oo}' '{s}' '{ch}' (-> s <- '{oo}{n}' insert s)
        )
      )
    )
  )

  define steps3 as (
    [substring] among (
      '{y}{s}{a}' '{y}{s}{e}{s}' '{y}{s}{e}' '{y}{s}{a}{m}{e}' '{y}{s}{a}{t}{e}' '{y}{s}{a}{n}' '{y}{s}{a}{n}{e}' (
        delete
        do unset test1
        ('{y}{s}{a}' atlimit <- '{y}{s}') or
        ([substring] atlimit among (
          '{a}{n}{a}{m}{p}{a}' '{a}{th}{r}{o}' '{e}{m}{p}{a}' '{e}{s}{e}' '{e}{s}{oo}{k}{l}{e}' '{e}{p}{a}' '{x}{a}{n}{a}{p}{a}' '{e}{p}{e}' '{p}{e}{r}{y}{p}{a}'
          '{s}{u}{n}{a}{th}{r}{o}' '{d}{a}{n}{e}' '{k}{l}{e}' '{ch}{a}{r}{t}{o}{p}{a}' '{e}{x}{a}{r}{ch}{a}' '{m}{e}{t}{e}{p}{e}' '{a}{p}{o}{k}{l}{e}'
          '{a}{p}{e}{k}{l}{e}' '{e}{k}{l}{e}' '{p}{e}'
          (-> s <- '{y}' insert s)
        )) or
        ([substring] atlimit among (
          '{a}{n}' '{a}{f}' '{g}{e}' '{g}{y}{g}{a}{n}{t}{o}{a}{f}' '{g}{k}{e}' '{d}{i}{m}{o}{k}{r}{a}{t}' '{k}{o}{m}' '{g}{k}' '{m}' '{p}'
          '{p}{o}{u}{k}{a}{m}' '{o}{l}{o}' '{l}{a}{r}'
          (-> s <- '{y}{s}' insert s)
        ))
      )
    )
  )

  define steps4 as (
    [substring] among (
      '{y}{s}{oo}' '{y}{s}{e}{y}{s}' '{y}{s}{e}{y}' '{y}{s}{o}{u}{m}{e}' '{y}{s}{e}{t}{e}' '{y}{s}{o}{u}{n}' '{y}{s}{o}{u}{n}{e}' (
        delete
        do unset test1
        [substring] atlimit among (
          '{a}{n}{a}{m}{p}{a}' '{e}{m}{p}{a}' '{e}{s}{e}' '{e}{s}{oo}{k}{l}{e}' '{e}{p}{a}' '{x}{a}{n}{a}{p}{a}' '{e}{p}{e}' '{p}{e}{r}{y}{p}{a}' '{a}{th}{r}{o}'
          '{s}{u}{n}{a}{th}{r}{o}' '{d}{a}{n}{e}' '{k}{l}{e}' '{ch}{a}{r}{t}{o}{p}{a}' '{e}{x}{a}{r}{ch}{a}' '{m}{e}{t}{e}{p}{e}' '{a}{p}{o}{k}{l}{e}' '{a}{p}{e}{k}{l}{e}'
          '{e}{k}{l}{e}' '{p}{e}'
          (-> s <- '{y}' insert s)
        )
      )
    )
  )

  define steps5 as (
    [substring] among (
      '{y}{s}{t}{o}{s}' '{y}{s}{t}{o}{u}' '{y}{s}{t}{o}' '{y}{s}{t}{e}' '{y}{s}{t}{o}{y}' '{y}{s}{t}{oo}{n}' '{y}{s}{t}{o}{u}{s}' '{y}{s}{t}{i}' '{y}{s}{t}{i}{s}'
      '{y}{s}{t}{a}' '{y}{s}{t}{e}{s}' (
        delete
        do unset test1
        ([substring] atlimit among (
          '{d}{a}{n}{e}' '{s}{u}{n}{a}{th}{r}{o}' '{k}{l}{e}' '{s}{e}' '{e}{s}{oo}{k}{l}{e}' '{a}{s}{e}' '{p}{l}{e}'
          (-> s <- '{y}' insert s)
        )) or
        ([substring] atlimit among (
          '{m}' '{p}' '{a}{p}' '{a}{r}' '{i}{d}' '{k}{t}' '{s}{k}' '{s}{ch}' '{u}{ps}' '{f}{a}' '{ch}{r}' '{ch}{t}' '{a}{k}{t}'
          '{a}{o}{r}' '{a}{s}{ch}' '{a}{t}{a}' '{a}{ch}{n}' '{a}{ch}{t}' '{g}{e}{m}' '{g}{u}{r}' '{e}{m}{p}' '{e}{u}{p}' '{e}{ch}{th}' '{i}{f}{a}'
          'Ή{f}{a}' '{k}{a}{th}' '{k}{a}{k}' '{k}{u}{l}' '{l}{u}{g}' '{m}{a}{k}' '{m}{e}{g}' '{t}{a}{ch}' '{f}{y}{l}' '{ch}{oo}{r}'
          (-> s <- '{y}{s}{t}' insert s)
        ))
      )
    )
  )

  define steps6 as (
    [substring] among (
      '{y}{s}{m}{o}' '{y}{s}{m}{o}{y}' '{y}{s}{m}{o}{s}' '{y}{s}{m}{o}{u}' '{y}{s}{m}{o}{u}{s}' '{y}{s}{m}{oo}{n}' (
        delete
        do unset test1
        ([substring] atlimit among (
          '{s}{e}' '{m}{e}{t}{a}{s}{e}' '{m}{y}{k}{r}{o}{s}{e}' '{e}{g}{k}{l}{e}' '{a}{p}{o}{k}{l}{e}'
          (-> s <- '{y}{s}{m}' insert s)
        )) or
        ([substring] atlimit among (
          '{d}{a}{n}{e}' '{a}{n}{t}{y}{d}{a}{n}{e}'
          (-> s <- '{y}' insert s)
        )) or
        ([substring] among (
          '{a}{g}{n}{oo}{s}{t}{y}{k}' (<- '{a}{g}{n}{oo}{s}{t}')
          '{a}{t}{o}{m}{y}{k}' (<- '{a}{t}{o}{m}')
          '{g}{n}{oo}{s}{t}{y}{k}' (<- '{g}{n}{oo}{s}{t}')
          '{e}{th}{n}{y}{k}' (<- '{e}{th}{n}')
          '{e}{k}{l}{e}{k}{t}{y}{k}' (<- '{e}{k}{l}{e}{k}{t}')
          '{s}{k}{e}{p}{t}{y}{k}' (<- '{s}{k}{e}{p}{t}')
          '{t}{o}{p}{y}{k}' (<- '{t}{o}{p}')
          '{a}{l}{e}{x}{a}{n}{d}{r}{y}{n}' (<- '{a}{l}{e}{x}{a}{n}{d}{r}')
          '{v}{u}{z}{a}{n}{t}{y}{n}' (<- '{v}{u}{z}{a}{n}{t}')
          '{th}{e}{a}{t}{r}{y}{n}' (<- '{th}{e}{a}{t}{r}')
        ))
      )
    )
  )

  define steps7 as (
    [substring] among (
      '{a}{r}{a}{k}{y}' '{a}{r}{a}{k}{y}{a}' '{o}{u}{d}{a}{k}{y}' '{o}{u}{d}{a}{k}{y}{a}' (
        delete
        do unset test1
        [substring] atlimit among (
         '{s}' '{ch}'
         (-> s <- 'A{r}{a}{k}' insert s)
        )
      )
    )
  )
